Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB432.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 72.425 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In the event the death of a person is not a coroner's case, consent to an autopsy shall
be obtained from the decedent, by written consent, signed and acknowledged prior
to his or her death; or his or her spouse; or in the absence of a spouse, the next of
kin of the decedent; or in the absence of any of the above, the person who assumes
the responsibility to dispose of the body.
(2) The state medical examiner shall perform an autopsy on a decedent when the
death of the person is not a coroner's case if a request is made by written consent
by the decedent's spouse; or in the absence of a spouse, the next of kin of the
decedent; or in the absence of any of the above, the person who assumes the
responsibility to dispose of the body.
Section 2. KRS 72.460 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The cost of autopsies shall be paid for by the fiscal court; provided, however, that
the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, Office of the Kentucky State Medical
Examiner, may contract with pathologists and toxicologists and chemists and pay
for such autopsies within the budgetary limitations of funds appropriated by the
General Assembly for this purpose.
(2) The cost of an autopsy performed in accordance with the provisions of subsection
(2) of Section 1 of this Act shall be paid for by the person making the written
request for the autopsy.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/11/2025 1:00 PM Jacketed